Massachusetts, session 194th, H1019.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings 
2 unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
3  “Bag”, a container made of flexible material with an opening at the top, commonly used 
4 to carry things. 
5  “Carryout bag”, a bag provided to a customer to hold items purchased from or serviced 
6 by a business, retailer, organization or other entity; provided, however, that “carryout bag” shall 
7 not include a non-handled bag: (i) provided by a pharmacy to a customer purchasing prescription 
8 medication; (ii) used to protect items from damaging or contaminating other purchased items 
9 placed in a recycled paper bag or a reusable grocery bag; (iii) provided to contain an unwrapped 

2 of 12 10 food item; (iv) used to protect articles of clothing on a hanger; (v) used to prevent frozen food 
11 items from thawing; (vi) provided or made available to a customer purchasing raw meat, 
12 uncooked seafood or other similar products; or (vii) used to protect small items from loss. 
13  “Customer”, a person who purchases or otherwise receives goods, services or materials 
14 from a business, organization, corporation or other entity. 
15  “Department”, the department of environmental protection. 
16  “Disposable”, designed to be discarded after a single or limited number of uses and not 
17 designed or manufactured for long-term multiple reuse. 
18  “Food service ware”, disposable products used for serving or transporting foods or 
19 beverages for human consumption, including, but not limited to, plates, bowls, trays, cups, 
20 cartons, hinged or lidded containers, straws, stirrers, cup spill plugs, cup sleeves, condiments 
21 containers, utensils, cocktail sticks or picks, toothpicks, film wrap and napkins; provided, 
22 however, that “food service ware” shall not include detachable lids for beverage cups or food 
23 containers, coolers or ice chests. 
24  “Intentional release”, an event where one or more persons knowingly releases one or 
25 more balloons of any type into the atmosphere. 
26  “Plastic”, any synthetic or semi-synthetic material made partially or entirely from fossil 
27 fuel-based petrochemical polymers that retains its shape during its lifecycle, including, but not 
28 limited to, polystyrene, polyethylene, polypropylene and polycarbonate. 
29  “Postconsumer recycled material”, material used in a recycled paper bag that would 
30 otherwise be destined for solid waste disposal, having completed its intended end use and 

3 of 12 31 product life cycle, and that does not comprise any material or byproduct generated from, and 
32 commonly reused within, an original manufacturing and fabrication process. 
33  “Recycle”, to separate, dismantle or process the materials, components or commodities in 
34 materials for the purpose of preparation for use or reuse in new products or components; 
35 provided, however, that “recycle” shall not include energy recovery or energy generation by 
36 means of pyrolysis, gasification or other heat chemical conversion processes, or landfill disposal. 
37  “Recycled paper bag”, a paper bag that is 100 per cent recyclable and contains not less 
38 than 50 per cent postconsumer recycled material. 
39  “Reusable bag”, a bag that: (i) is made of machine-washable cloth, fabric, hemp or other 
40 woven or non-woven fibers; (ii) has handles that are stitched with thread and not heat-fused; and 
41 (iii) is designed and manufactured for multiple uses; provided, however, that a “reusable bag” 
42 shall not include a bag made of plastic film of any thickness. 
43  “Serviced” or “Servicing”, the past or present act of cleaning, repairing, improving, 
44 refinishing or altering an item owned by a customer by a person engaged in a retail business of 
45 customarily providing such services, including, but not limited to, dry cleaning and tailoring 
46 articles of clothing, jewelry repair and shoe and leather repair.  
47  Section 2. (a) A retailer or charging entity shall not provide a customer with a carryout 
48 bag unless such carryout bag is a recycled paper bag or a reusable bag; provided, however, that a 
49 customer shall be charged not less than 10 cents per recycled paper bag; and provided further, 
50 that a recycled paper bag purchased under this section shall not be subject to taxation pursuant to 
51 chapter 64H or 64I. 

4 of 12 52  (b) Five cents per recycled paper bag sold shall be remitted by the retailer or charging 
53 entity to the department of revenue at the same time and in the same manner as sales taxes are 
54 due to the commonwealth. The department of revenue shall deposit such amounts into the 
55 Plastics Environmental Protection Fund established under section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29. The 
56 department of revenue may promulgate regulations to facilitate the collection of the fee set forth 
57 in this paragraph. The retailer or charging entity shall retain the remainder of the amount charged 
58 to customers. 
59  (c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the sale or offering for sale of packages 
60 containing several bags, products or goods with a protective or other bag received from a 
61 manufacturer or distributor or bags offered for sale as a product or merchandise that are not 
62 carryout bags. 
63  (d) This section shall not apply to: (i) bags otherwise required to be used under state or 
64 federal law; or (ii) a nonprofit organization, charity or religious institution in the provision or 
65 distribution of food, clothing or other items at no cost or substantially reduced cost. 
66  (e) A business with only 1 store location of not more than 4,000 square feet of retail 
67 selling space and not more than 10 employees, and which provided not more than 10,000 
68 carryout bags in total during the previous calendar year, shall not be required to collect or remit 
69 bag fees as otherwise set forth in this section. 
70  Section 3.  (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a retailer or charging entity shall not 
71 provide a customer with disposable food service ware unless requested by the customer. 
72  (b) A retailer or charging entity may make disposable food service ware available to a 
73 consumer for self-service to allow for non-bundled, single-use food service ware to be obtained. 

5 of 12 74  (c) No food service ware provided consistent with this section shall be made from black 
75 plastic; provided, however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to prepared food 
76 packaged outside of the commonwealth. 
77  Section 4. No retail establishment shall sell or otherwise provide to a consumer alcoholic 
78 beverages in plastic containers less than or equal to 100 milliliters. Each day a retail 
79 establishment is in violation of this section shall be considered a separate violation. 
80  Section 5. No retail establishment shall sell or otherwise provide to a consumer plastic 
81 bottles containing 1 liter or less of non-carbonated, non-flavored water, except as may be 
82 required for safety, health, or public welfare, or to prepare for or respond to an emergency.  Each 
83 day a retail establishment is in violation of this section shall be considered a separate violation. 
84  Section 6. (a) For the purposes of this section, “state agency” shall mean any department 
85 of the executive branch, the legislative branch, the judicial branch and any independent state 
86 authority, quasi-public authority, board, district, commission, instrumentality or agency. 
87  (b) State agencies shall not procure single-use plastic bottles that have a capacity of not 
88 more than 21 fluid ounces; provided, however, that state agencies shall be exempt from this 
89 requirement if such exemption is required to provide for disability or accessibility related 
90 accommodations. 
91  (c) State funds shall not be used to purchase single-use plastic bottles that have a capacity 
92 of not more than 64 fluid ounces of non-carbonated, non-flavored water for use in a facility that 
93 is served by a public water supply or potable well water; provided, however, that state funds may 
94 be used if required to provide for disability or accessibility related accommodations. 

6 of 12 95  Subsections (b) and (c) shall not apply: (i) when no alternative is available or practicable; 
96 (ii) when necessary to protect health, safety and welfare; (iii) when compliance with this section 
97 would conflict with contract requirements or labor agreements in existence as of the effective 
98 date of this section or agreements solicited before the effective date of this section; and (iv) to 
99 prepare for or respond to an emergency. 
100  Section 7. The department shall establish a statewide program to provide for the recycling 
101 of bulk plastic materials, including, but not limited to child passenger restraints as defined in 
102 section 1 of chapter 90, and may: (i) implement local or regional bulk plastic recycling programs; 
103 (ii) accept applications from municipalities for grants and to award grants to assist in the 
104 development or establishment of local and regional bulk plastic recycling projects; and (iii) 
105 partner or contract with private organizations to assist in the development or establishment of a 
106 bulk plastic recycling program. 
107  Section 8. (a) The organization of or participation in an intentional release of any type of 
108 balloon, including but not limited to plastic, latex and mylar, filled with any type of gas lighter 
109 than air is hereby prohibited. Each intentional release, or organization of an intentional release, 
110 shall constitute a separate violation. 
111  (b) The provisions of this section shall not apply to: (i) balloons released by or on behalf 
112 of any agency of the commonwealth or the United States for scientific or meteorological 
113 purposes; (ii) hot air balloons that are recovered after launch; or (iii) balloons released by a 
114 person under the age of 12 years. 
115  (c) The department shall prepare and make available to retail distributors (i) notice of the 
116 provisions of this section; and (ii) information about the harmful effects of releasing balloons 

7 of 12 117 into the environment. The notice shall be available in English and in any other language spoken 
118 by at least ten percent of the Massachusetts population. The notice shall be available for 
119 download on the department’s website. 
120  (d) Retail distributors of balloons of any type shall: (i) post the notice described in 
121 subparagraph (c) on websites used for online sales transactions and in retail locations in a 
122 location that is visible to customers; and (ii) provide each customer purchasing one or more 
123 balloons, including but not limited to online transactions, with information about the harmful 
124 effects of releasing balloons into the environment. Retailers may provide customers purchasing 
125 balloons with weights and fasteners. 
126  Section 9. A municipality shall not pass, adopt, promulgate or otherwise effectuate an 
127 ordinance, by-law or other rule or regulation inconsistent with this chapter. 
128  Section 10. Except as otherwise provided, the department shall promulgate regulations to 
129 implement and enforce this chapter. The department may promulgate regulations to increase the 
130 minimum postconsumer recycled material required for recycled paper bags. 
131  Section 11. The department shall establish and assess civil administrative penalties 
132 pursuant to section 16 of chapter 21A for violations of this chapter. 
133  The superior court department of the trial court may assess civil penalties as set forth in 
134 this section and enjoin violations of, and grant such additional relief as it deems necessary or 
135 appropriate to secure compliance with, the provisions of this chapter, or any regulation, rule or 
136 other order or action adopted or issued pursuant to this section. The attorney general and district 
137 attorneys may bring enforcement actions under this section in the superior court department of 
138 the trial court or any other court of competent jurisdiction. 

8 of 12 139  SECTION 2. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
140 section 2DDDDDD the following section:- 
141  Section 2EEEEEE. (a) There shall be a Plastics Environmental Protection Fund to be 
142 expended, without prior appropriation, by the department of environmental protection. The fund 
143 shall consist of: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the general court 
144 and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) interest earned on such revenues; (iii) 
145 funds from public and private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, donations and 
146 settlements received by the commonwealth that are designated to be credited to the fund; (iv) 
147 federal funds paid to the commonwealth designated to be credited to the fund; and (v) monies 
148 paid to the commonwealth pursuant to chapter 21P, including all funds collected by the 
149 department of revenue pursuant to section 2 of said chapter 21P. The fund shall be expended to: 
150 (i) improve the air, water, soil or other environmental conditions for low and moderate income 
151 communities; (ii) provide reusable bags to low and moderate income communities and 
152 individuals receiving benefits administered by the department of transitional assistance at no 
153 cost; (iii) issue grants to small businesses that are incorporated and have principal places of 
154 business in the commonwealth to assist in the reduction of plastic use within each business, 
155 including, but not limited to, small businesses in the food service and production industries; and 
156 (iv) provide multilingual, culturally competent educational materials and programming, 
157 including, but not limited to, experiential education regarding bag reuse and recycling and other 
158 aspects of environmental protection. Any bond proceeds deposited into the fund shall be kept 
159 separate from any and all other funds deposited into the fund. No expenditure from the fund shall 
160 cause the fund to be in deficiency at the close of a fiscal year. Monies deposited into the fund 

9 of 12 161 that are unexpended at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall be 
162 available for expenditure in the subsequent fiscal year.  
163  (b) The department of environmental protection shall administer the fund. Annually, not 
164 later than March 1, the department shall report on the activities of the fund from the previous 
165 calendar year to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the senate and house 
166 committees on ways and means and the joint committee on environment and natural resources. 
167 The department may promulgate regulations or issue other guidance to implement this section. 
168 The department shall consult with the department of transitional assistance to equitably 
169 implement the provision of no-cost reusable bags as set forth in subsection (a). The department 
170 shall consult with the Massachusetts Growth Capital Corporation to equitably implement the 
171 provision of grants to small businesses to assist in the reduction of plastic use. 
172  SECTION 3. Chapter 94 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
173 section 329 the following section:- 
174  Section 330. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
175 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
176  “Covered entity”, a person, corporation, business or other entity that manufactures, 
177 produces or packages a covered product and shall include, but not be limited to, a wholesaler, 
178 supplier or retailer that is responsible for labeling a covered product. 
179  “Covered product”, a premoistened, nonwoven disposable wipe composed in part or 
180 entirely of petrochemical-derived fibers that is reasonably likely to be flushed down a toilet or 
181 otherwise caused to enter a plumbing, septic or sewer system; provided, however, that a 
182 “covered product” shall include, but not be limited to, baby wipes, disinfecting wipes and facial 

10 of 12 183 wipes; provided further, that a “covered product” shall not include wipes composed entirely of 
184 wood pulp fibers and engineered to lose strength and degrade after disposal. 
185  (b) A covered entity shall clearly label a covered product that the entity produces, 
186 manufactures, packages, offers for sale or sells in the commonwealth with the phrase “Do Not 
187 Flush”. 
188  (c) Whoever violates this section, or any regulation, rule or other order or action adopted 
189 or issued pursuant to this section, shall be subject to a fine, civil penalty or, notwithstanding the 
190 limitations set forth in section 16 of chapter 21A, civil administrative penalty of not more than 
191 $2,500 per violation. Producing, manufacturing, packaging, offering for sale or selling 1 or more 
192 units of the same covered product in violation of this section shall constitute a single violation 
193 for each day such violation occurs. This shall be in addition to any other penalty or remedy 
194 prescribed by law. 
195  The attorney general and district attorneys shall enforce this section. The office of 
196 consumer affairs and business regulation may refer violations of this section to a district attorney 
197 or the attorney general for enforcement, including, but not limited to, for actions to assess 
198 monetary penalties and enjoinment. The superior court department of the trial court shall have 
199 jurisdiction to assess civil penalties as set forth in this section and to enjoin violations of, and 
200 grant such additional relief as it deems necessary or appropriate to secure compliance with, this 
201 section, or any regulation, rule or other order or action adopted or issued pursuant to this section. 
202  (d) The office of consumer affairs and business regulation may promulgate regulations to 
203 implement and enforce this section. 

11 of 12 204  SECTION 4. The department of environmental protection shall conduct a culturally 
205 competent and linguistically diverse outreach and education program regarding non-flushable 
206 wipes consistent with section 330 of chapter 94 of the General Laws. In preparing and delivering 
207 the outreach and education program, the department shall consult with the Massachusetts Water 
208 Resources Authority, the Greater Lawrence Sanitary District, Upper Blackstone Clean Water, the 
209 city of Springfield water and sewer commission, the city of Pittsfield wastewater treatment plant 
210 division, the city of New Bedford department of public infrastructure wastewater division, the 
211 city of Fall River sewer commission, the city of Brockton department of public works sewer 
212 division, the town of Franklin water and sewer division, the city of Attleboro wastewater 
213 department and the Barnstable county Alternative Septic System Tracking program. 
214  SECTION 5. Not later than December 31, 2025, the department of environmental 
215 protection shall publish on its website and submit to the clerks of the senate and house of 
216 representatives, the senate and house committees on ways and means and the joint committee on 
217 environment and natural resources a report stating its progress on implementing the composting 
218 and other components of the department’s Organics Action Plan of November 2023. The report 
219 shall clearly indicate any legislative changes or resources necessary to increase the rate at which 
220 food and organic waste is composted and reduce the contamination of waste and recycling 
221 streams by compostable materials. 
222  SECTION 6. The department of environmental protection shall study and make 
223 recommendations on the feasibility and benefits of banning foam and solid polystyrene in the 
224 commonwealth. The study shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of the: (i) 
225 environmental and other benefits of banning foam and solid polystyrene products; (ii) health 
226 impacts of foam and solid polystyrene use; (iii) reasonable and affordable alternatives to foam 

12 of 12 227 and solid polystyrene; and (iv) cost impacts of banning foam and solid polystyrene products on 
228 retailers, consumers and municipalities. 
229  Not later than June 30, 2026, the department shall file a report on their findings and 
230 recommendations with the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives and the joint 
231 committee on environment and natural resources. 
232  SECTION 7. Except as otherwise provided herein, this act shall take effect on January 1, 
233 2026. 
234  SECTION 8. Section 3 shall take effect on January 1, 2028. 
235  SECTION 9. Section 4 shall take effect on January 1, 2027.